Washington statutes.
RCW 9.41.368

Firearm security and storage—Loss or theft—Owner or other person.

(1) An owner or other person lawfully in possession of a firearm who suffers the loss or theft of the firearm shall report the facts and circumstances of the loss or theft to the local law enforcement agency where the loss or theft occurred within 24 hours after the person first discovered the loss or theft unless the delay is for good cause shown. The report must include, to the extent known: The firearm's caliber, make, model, manufacturer, and serial number; any other distinguishing number or identification mark on the firearm; and the circumstances of the loss or theft, including the date, place, and manner.

(2) A law enforcement agency that receives a report of a lost or stolen firearm shall enter the following information, to the extent known, into the national crime information center database:

(a) The firearm's caliber, make, model, manufacturer, and serial number; and

(b) Any other distinguishing number or identification mark on the firearm.

(3) A person who fails to report a lost or stolen firearm in violation of this section commits a civil infraction and is subject to a monetary penalty of up to $1,000. If multiple firearms are lost or stolen in a single event, the owner or person who was lawfully in possession of the firearms at the time of loss or theft who fails to report the event shall be subject to a single monetary penalty.

(4) The duly constituted licensing authority of any city, town, or political subdivision of this state, upon issuing a firearm dealer's license in accordance with RCW 9.41.110, shall issue the dealer signage the dealer must post in a conspicuous place at each point-of-sale that states in block letters not less than one inch in height: "FAILURE TO KEEP FIREARMS IN SECURE GUN STORAGE, OR SECURED WITH A TRIGGER LOCK OR SIMILAR DEVICE THAT IS DESIGNED TO PREVENT THE UNAUTHORIZED USE OR DISCHARGE OF THE FIREARM MAY SUBJECT YOU TO CRIMINAL PENALTIES.

FAILURE TO REPORT THE LOSS OR THEFT OF A FIREARM MAY SUBJECT YOU TO A CIVIL PENALTY UP TO $1,000."

[ 2024 c 286 s 1.]